New York, session 2025-2026, A7615.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 35.03 of the parks, recreation and 2 historic preservation law is amended by adding a new paragraph (w) to 3 read as follows: 4 (w) The Scajaquada heritage area, encompassing the cohesive geographic 5 area of the city of Buffalo surrounding and associated with the Scaja- 6 quada creek. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10481-03-5